Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 53
SALES OF ORE

Section

34-53-101. Purchasing ore unlawfully - penalty.

Any person, association, or corporation, or the agent of any person, association, or corporation, who knowingly purchases, or contracts to purchase, or makes any payment for or on account of any ore which has been taken from any mine or claim, by persons who have taken or may be holding possession of any such mine or claim, contrary to any penal law in force, shall be considered as an accessory after the fact to the unlawful holding or taking of such mine or claim and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subjected to the same punishment to which the principals may be liable.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1961.

G.S.

§ 2510.

R.S. 08:

§ 4239.

C.L.

§ 3353.

CSA:

C. 110, § 246.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-1.

34-53-102. False weights - scales - penalty.

Any person, association, or corporation, or the agent of any person, association, or corporation, engaged in the business of milling, sampling, concentrating, reducing, shipping, or purchasing ores who keeps or uses any false or fraudulent scales or weights for weighing ore, or who keeps or uses any false or fraudulent assay scales or weights for ascertaining the assay value of ore, knowing them to be false, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1962.

G.S.

§ 2511.

R.S. 08:

§ 4240.

C.L.

§ 3354.

CSA:

C. 110, § 247.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3275, § 610, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For penalty for use or possession of false weights or measures, see § 18-5-301.

34-53-103. Altering value - certificate - penalty.

Any person, corporation, or association, or the agent of any person, corporation, or association, engaged in the milling, sampling, concentrating, reducing, shipping, or purchasing of ores in this state who in any manner knowingly alters or changes the true value of any ores delivered to him or her, so as to deprive the seller of the result of the correct value of the same, or who substitutes other ores for those delivered to him or her, or who issues any bill of sale or certificate of purchase that does not exactly and truthfully state the actual weight, assay value, and total amount paid for any lot of ore purchased, or who, by any secret understanding or agreement with another, issues a bill of sale or certificate of purchase that does not truthfully and correctly set forth the weight, assay value, and total amount paid for any lot of ore purchased by him or her commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1963.

G.S.

§ 2512.

R.S. 08:

§ 4241.

C.L.

§ 3355.

CSA:

C. 110, § 248.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-3.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3275, § 611, effective March 1, 2022.

34-53-104. Failure to account - penalty.

The owner, manager, or agent of any species of quartz mill, arrastra mill, furnace, or cupel, employed in extracting gold from quartz, pyrites, or other minerals, who neglects or refuses to account for, or pay over and deliver, all the proceeds thereof to the owner of such quartz, pyrites, or other mineral, excepting such portion of said proceeds as he or she is entitled to in return for his or her services, commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

R.S.

p. 232, § 165.

G.L.

§ 765.

G.S.

§ 887.

R.S. 08:

§ 4242.

C.L.

§ 3356.

CSA:

C. 110, § 249.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-4.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 882, § 60, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 848, § 125, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1547, § 303, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 54 (1980).

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

34-53-105. Person in possession of ore deemed owner.

Any person, association of persons, or corporation in the peaceful possession of any mining claim, under claim or color of title, and engaged in the mining and sale of ores therefrom, as to all persons purchasing such ore, in good faith and without notice, as provided in section 34-53-107, of the claim of any other person, association, or corporation to such mining claim, shall be deemed to be the owner of such ore.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 273, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 4244.

C.L.

§ 3358.

CSA:

C. 110, § 251.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-6.

34-53-106. Purchasing ore in good faith.

Any person who, or association or corporation which, in good faith and in the usual course of business, and without notice, as provided in section 34-53-107, purchases and obtains delivery of any ore from any person, association, or corporation in possession of any mining claim is deemed the owner of such ore, and shall not be subject to any action therefor and for the value thereof by any person, association, or corporation who may ultimately be adjudged to be the owner of such mining claim.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 274, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 4245.

C.L.

§ 3359.

CSA:

C. 110, § 252.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-7.

34-53-107. Notice of adverse claim - action.

If any person, association, or corporation is or claims to be the owner or entitled to the possession of any mining claim in the actual possession of some other person, association, or corporation claiming to be the owner or entitled to the possession thereof, and mining and shipping ore therefrom, if he desires to hold purchasers of such ore responsible for the value of such ore, may serve or cause to be served upon such purchaser a notice in writing, setting forth the name of the mining claim, the names of the claimants and owners thereof, the name of the person, association, or corporation mining or shipping ore therefrom, and warning such purchaser that he will be held responsible for all ores purchased and delivered from such mine by such person, association, or corporation, or his heirs and assigns subsequent to the service of such notice. Within five days from and after the service of such notice, the person, association, or corporation serving or causing the same to be served shall institute an action in some court of competent jurisdiction against the person, association, or corporation in possession of such mining claim to enjoin him from the mining or shipment or sale of ores therefrom pending such action and shall at once notify such purchaser of the pendency of such action. If the notice provided for in this section shall be served after such an action has been instituted it shall not be necessary to commence another under the provisions hereof.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 274, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 4246.

C.L.

§ 3360.

CSA:

C. 110, § 253.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-8.

34-53-108. Injunction - effect of denial.

The person, association, or corporation bringing or having instituted such action, within thirty days after the service of said notice, shall cause an application for an injunction against the defendant therein to be heard before the court in which the same shall be pending. If the injunction is denied or if the application therefor is not made within said period of thirty days, the notice served shall be held for naught, and all persons shall be at liberty to purchase ores from the mining claim or from the person, association, or corporation in possession of and working the same as aforesaid, as though such notice had never been served.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 275, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 4247.

C.L.

§ 3361.

CSA:

C. 110, § 254.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-9.

Cross references:

For injunctions generally, see C.R.C.P. 65.

34-53-109. Dissolution of injunction.

If any injunction granted under such application therefor, as provided for in section 34-53-108, is dissolved, all persons shall be at liberty to purchase ores from the mining claims affected thereby, from any person, association, or corporation in possession thereof, and working the same under claim or color of title, and no action shall be brought or maintained against such purchaser for the value thereof, notwithstanding that the title and right of possession of and to such mining claim shall be ultimately adjudged against such person, association, or corporation in possession.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 275, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 4248.

C.L.

§ 3362.

CSA:

C. 110, § 255.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-10.

34-53-110. Effect of failure to institute action.

If any person, association, or corporation which has not already brought an action serves a notice upon any purchaser of ores, as provided in section 34-53-107, and fails or neglects to institute an action and apply for an injunction as required in section 34-53-108, said notice is of no effect and the purchaser shall not be bound by anything contained therein. If such an action shall be pending at the time of the giving of such notice the same shall be mentioned therein.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 275, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 4249.

C.L.

§ 3363.

CSA:

C. 110, § 256.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-11.

34-53-111. When purchaser held responsible.

Any purchaser of ores who has received the notice provided for in section 34-53-107 and followed or preceded by the commencement of an action and application for an injunction thereunder, as set forth in this article, who continues to purchase and receive ores from the mining claims named in such notice, shall be responsible for the value thereof to the person, association, or corporation who is adjudged to be the owner or entitled to the possession of such mining claims.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 275, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 4250.

C.L.

§ 3364.

CSA:

C. 110, § 257.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-12.

34-53-112. Applicability - bad faith.

Sections 34-53-105 to 34-53-112 shall not apply to any ore or ores mined, shipped, or sold in contravention of the terms of sections 34-53-101 to 34-53-103.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 276, § 8.

R.S. 08:

§ 4251.

C.L.

§ 3365.

CSA:

C. 110, § 258.

CRS 53:

§ 92-30-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-30-13.